Utah statutes.
63G-10-103.   Notice of voidableness of settlement agreements.

Each financial settlement agreement that might cost government entities more than $100,000 that is executed by an agency in violation of this chapter, and each action settlement agreement that is executed by an agency in violation of this chapter, is voidable by the governor or the Legislature as provided in this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

